North Dakota, session 69, HB1001.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, to the office of the governor for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the
office of the governor, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Salaries and wages $4,426,244 $1,493,905 $5,920,149
New and vacant FTE Pool 0 117,387 117,387
Operating expenses 509,331 213,214 722,545
Contingencies 10,000 0 10,000
Rough rider awards 10,800 4,200 15,000
Governor's salary 310,621 (310,621) 0
Children's cabinet 0 65,000 65,000
Total general fund $5,266,996 $1,583,085 $6,850,081
Full-time equivalent positions 19.00 0.00 19.00
SECTION 2. ONE-TIME FUNDING - EFFECT ON BASE BUDGET - REPORT TO SEVENTIETH
LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. The following amounts reflect the one-time funding items included in the
appropriation in section 1 of this Act which are not included in the entity's base budget for the 2027-29
biennium and which the entity shall report to the appropriations committees of the seventieth legislative
assembly regarding the use of this funding:
One- Time Funding Description General Fund
Children's cabinet consulting services $30,000
Total $30,000
SECTION 3. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - LIMITATION - TRANSFER REQUEST. The
governor's office may not spend funds appropriated in the new and vacant FTE pool line item in
section 1 of this Act, but may request the office of management and budget to transfer funds from the
new and vacant FTE pool line item to the salaries and wages line item in accordance with the
guidelines and reporting provisions included in House Bill No. 1015, as approved by the sixty-ninth
legislative assembly.
SECTION 4. ADDITIONAL INCOME - APPROPRIATION - GOVERNOR'S OFFICE - BUDGET
SECTION REPORT. Subject to the limitations of this section, in addition to the amounts appropriated in
section 1 of this Act, there is appropriated to the governor's office, any additional income from other
funds, excluding federal funds, which may become available to the governor's office, for the period
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. Any other funds received under this section must be
used for the specific purpose intended for the funds or transferred to the appropriate state agency or
institution. Upon the receipt of other funds under this section, the governor's office shall provide a report
to the budget section regarding the source, amount, and purpose of the funds received. Federal funds
which may become available to the governor's office may be accepted by the governor's office. Federal

H. B. NO. 1001 - PAGE 2
funds accepted by the governor's office may not be spent until authorization is received from the
legislative assembly or from the emergency commission and budget section under chapter 54-16.
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Section 54-07-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-07-04. Salary of governor.
The annual salary of the governor is one hundred fifty-two thousand two hundred sixty-five dollars
through June 30, 2024, and one hundred fifty-eight thousand three hundred fifty-six one hundred sixty-
three thousand one hundred seven dollars through June 30, 2026, and one hundred sixty-eigh t
thousand dollars thereafter.
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Section 54-08-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-08-03. Salary of lieutenant governor.
The annual salary of the lieutenant governor is one hundred thirty thousand dollars through
June 30, 2024, and one hundred thirty-five thousand two hundredone hundred thirty-nine thousand
two hundred fifty - six dollars through June 30, 2026, and one hundred forty-three thousand four hundred
thirty-four dollars thereafter.
SECTION 7. EXEMPTION - UNEXPENDED APPROPRIATIONS. The sum of $130,000
appropriated from the general fund for constituent management software in section 1 of chapter 33 of
the 2023 Session Laws is not subject to the provisions of section 54-44.1-11 and may be continued into
the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.

H. B. NO. 1001 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1001.
House Vote: Yeas 79 Nays 12 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 1 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State